Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1859XS (3) 91 cm/jh S.F. 330 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 625.30 Costs ââ attorney fees ââ 1 prevailing parties. 2 1. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, in a civil 3 action the court shall award costs and reasonable attorney fees 4 to a prevailing party. 5 2. This section does not apply to actions by or against the 6 state, other governmental entities, or public officials acting 7 in their official capacity or under color of law. 8 3. For purposes of this section, âprevailing partyâ means 9 a party with a net monetary recovery, a defendant in whose 10 favor a dismissal is entered, a defendant where neither 11 plaintiff nor defendant obtains any relief, or a defendant as 12 against a plaintiff who does not recover any relief against 13 the defendant. If a party recovers other than monetary relief 14 and in situations other than as specified, the court shall 15 determine if a party is a prevailing party for purposes of this 16 section. 17 Sec. 2. LEGISLATIVE PROPOSALS. The supreme court shall 18 submit legislative proposals, in due course, to the senate 19 and house of representatives standing committees on judiciary 20 to amend the Iowa Code to delete redundancies, resolve 21 inconsistencies and conflicts, and remove any ambiguities 22 caused by this Act. 23 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to causes of action 24 filed on or after July 1, 2025. 25